District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
14 act may be cited as the ''Nationals Park Financing Act of 2026".
15 Sec. 2 Definitions.
16 For the purposes of this act, the term:
17 (1) "Authorized Delegate" means the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
18 Development, the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer, or any officer or employee of the
19 executive office of the Mayor to whom the Mayor has delegated any of the Mayor's functions
20 under this act pursuant to section 422(6) of the Home Rule Act.
21 (2) "Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund" means the fund established by District
22 of Columbia Official Code § 10-1601.02a.
23 (3) "Bond Counsel" means a firm or firms of attorneys designated as bond counsel from
24 time to time by the Mayor.
25 (4) "Bonds" means the District of Columbia revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations, in
26 one or more series, authorized to be issued pursuant to this act. Unless otherwise specified, the
27 term "bonds" shall include Refunding Bonds.

28 (5) “Closing Documents” means all documents and agreements, other than Financing
29 Documents, that may be necessary and appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds, and
30 includes agreements, certificates, letters, opinions, forms, receipts, and other similar instruments.
31 (6) “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.
32 (7) “Development Costs” has the same meaning as in section 2(13) of the Tax Increment
33 Financing Authorization Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-143; D.C.
34 Official Code § 2-1217.01(13)).
35 (8) “District” means the District of Columbia.
36 (9) “Financing Documents” means the documents, other than Closing Documents, that
37 relate to the financing or refinancing of transactions to be effected through the issuance, sale, and
38 delivery of the bonds, including any offering document, and any required supplements to any such
39 documents.
40 (10) “Home Rule Act” means the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
41 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.).
42 (11) “Nationals Park” means the Ballpark defined in D.C. Official Code §47-
43 2002.05(a)(1)(A).
44 (12) “Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of Development Costs
45 incurred for the renovation of Nationals Park.
46 (13) “Refunding Bonds” means the District of Columbia bonds, notes, or other obligations
47 to be issued pursuant to this act to refund the bonds.
2

48 Sec. 3. Bond authorization.
49 (a) The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of bonds in an
50 aggregate principal amount not to exceed $410 million or such lesser amount as necessary in order
51 to generate net proceeds of $380 million to fund Development Costs of the project, provided,
52 however, that no amount may be issued in excess of the level of funding supportable by revenues
53 of the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund, as determined by the Office of the Chief
54 Financial Officer. The bonds, which may be issued from time to time, in one or more series, shall
55 be tax-exempt or taxable as the Mayor shall determine and shall be payable and secured as
56 provided in section 4. The District hereby declares its intent to issue bonds in the amount
57 authorized in this subsection and to use the proceeds to pay or reimburse expenditures for the costs
58 of the purposes or improvements described in this act. This subsection is a declaration of intent
59 within the meaning of, and for purposes described in, Treasury Regulation 1.150-2 (26 C.F.R. §
60 1.150-2).
61 (b) The proceeds of the bonds shall be used as follows:
62 (1) An amount not to exceed $380 million to pay Development Costs of the project;
63 and
64 (2) The balance of the proceeds to pay the financing costs incurred by the District
65 and to fund capitalized interest and required reserves.
66 (c) The Mayor shall pay from the proceeds of the bonds the financing costs of issuing and
67 delivering the bonds, including, but not limited to, underwriting, legal, accounting, financial
68 advisory, credit enhancement, marketing, sale, and printing costs and expenses.
69 Sec. 4. Payment and security.
3

70 (a) Except as may be otherwise provided in this act, the principal of, premium, if any, and
71 interest on, the bonds, and the payment of ongoing administrative expenses related to the bond
72 financing shall be payable solely from proceeds received from the sale of the bonds, income
73 realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, receipts and revenues realized by the
74 District and deposited into the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund, income realized from
75 the temporary investment of those receipts and revenues prior to payment to the bond owners, and
76 other funds that, as provided in the Financing Documents, may be made available to the District
77 for payment of the bonds from sources other than the District, all as provided for in the Financing
78 Documents.
79 (b) Payment of the bonds shall be secured as provided in the Financing Documents and by
80 an assignment by the District for the benefit of the bond owners of certain of its rights under the
81 Financing Documents and Closing Documents to the trustee for the bonds pursuant to the
82 Financing Documents.
83 (c) The trustee or paying agent is authorized to deposit, invest, and disburse the proceeds
84 received from the sale of the bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.
85 Sec. 5. Bond details.
86 (a) The Mayor is authorized to take any action reasonably necessary or appropriate in
87 accordance with this act in connection with the preparation, execution, issuance, sale, delivery,
88 security for, and payment of the bonds, including, but not limited to, determinations of:
89 (1) The final form, content, designation, and terms of the bonds, including a
90 determination that the bonds may be issued in certificated or book-entry form;
91 (2) The principal amount of the bonds to be issued and denominations of the bonds;
4

92 (3) The rate or rates of interest or the method for determining the rate or rates of
93 interest on the bonds;
94 (4) The date or dates of issuance, sale, and delivery of, and the payment of interest
95 on, the bonds, and the maturity date or dates of the bonds;
96 (5) The terms under which the bonds may be paid, optionally or mandatorily
97 redeemed, accelerated, tendered, called, or put for redemption, repurchase, or remarketing before
98 their respective stated maturities;
99 (6) Provisions for the registration, transfer, and exchange of the bonds and the
100 replacement of mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed bonds;
101 (7) The creation of any reserve fund, sinking fund, or other fund with respect to the
102 bonds;
103 (8) The time and place of payment of the bonds;
104 (9) Procedures for monitoring the use of the proceeds received from the sale of the
105 bonds to ensure that the proceeds are properly applied and used to accomplish the
106 purposes of the Home Rule Act and this act;
107 (10) Actions necessary to qualify the bonds under blue sky laws of any jurisdiction
108 where the bonds are marketed; and
109 (11) The terms and types of any credit enhancement under which the bonds may be
110 secured.
111 (b) The bonds shall contain a legend which shall provide that the bonds are special
112 obligations of the District, are without recourse to the District, are not a pledge of, and do not
113 involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the receipts and revenues
114 deposited into the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund), do not constitute a debt of the
5

115 District, and do not constitute lending of the public credit for private undertakings as prohibited in
116 section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
117 (c) The bonds shall be executed in the name of the District and on its behalf by the manual
118 or facsimile signature of the Mayor and attested by the Secretary of State of the District of
119 Columbia by the Secretary’s manual or facsimile signature.
120 (d) The official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed, printed, or
121 otherwise reproduced on the bonds.
122 (e) The bonds of any series may be issued in accordance with the terms of a trust instrument
123 to be entered into by the District and a trustee or paying agent to be selected by the Mayor and
124 may be subject to the terms of one or more agreements entered into by the Mayor pursuant to
125 section 490(a)(4) of the Home Rule Act.
126 (f) The bonds may be issued at any time or from time to time in one or more issues and in
127 one or more series.
128 (g) The bonds are declared to be issued for essential public and governmental purposes.
129 The bonds, the interest thereon, and the income therefrom, and all funds pledged or available to
130 pay or secure the payment of the bonds, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by the District,
131 except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
132 (h) The District pledges, covenants, and agrees with the holders of the bonds that, subject
133 to the provisions of the Financing Documents, the District will not limit or alter the revenues
134 pledged to secure the bonds or the basis on which such revenues are collected or allocated, will
135 not impair the contractual obligations of the District to fulfill the terms of any agreement made
136 with the holders of the bonds, will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of
137 the bonds, and will not modify, in any way, the exemptions from taxation provided for in this act,
6

138 until the bonds, together with interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection with any
139 suit, action, or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders of the bonds, are fully met and discharged.
140 This pledge and agreement for the District may be included as part of the contract with the holders
141 of the bonds. This subsection constitutes a contract between the District and the holders of the
142 bonds. To the extent that any acts or resolutions of the Council may be in conflict with this act,
143 this act shall be controlling.
144 (i) Consistent with section 490(a)(4)(B) of the Home Rule Act and notwithstanding Article
145 9 of Chapter 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code:
146 (1) A pledge made and security interest created in respect of the bonds or pursuant
147 to any related Financing Document shall be valid, binding, and perfected from the time the security
148 interest is created, with or without physical delivery of any funds or any property and with or
149 without any further action;
150 (2) The lien of the pledge shall be valid, binding, and perfected as against all parties
151 having any claim of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the District, whether or not
152 such party has notice; and
153 (3) The security interest shall be valid, binding, and perfected whether or not any
154 statement, document, or instrument relating to the security interest is recorded or filed.
155 Sec. 6. Issuance of the bonds.
156 (a) The bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or
157 below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in the
158 best interests of the District.
159 (b) The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of the
160 bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering document
7

161 on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations governing
162 such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with the bonds.
163 (c) The Mayor is authorized to deliver executed and sealed bonds, on behalf of the District,
164 for authentication, and, after the bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the bonds to the original
165 purchasers of the bonds upon payment of the purchase price.
166 (d) The bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from Bond
167 Counsel as to the validity of the bonds of such series and, if the interest on the bonds is expected
168 to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the bonds for purposes
169 of federal income taxation.
170 (e) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-
171 371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of the
172 District of Columbia Official Code shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time to
173 time enter into, or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate, for the purposes of
174 this act.
175 Sec. 7. Financing and Closing Documents.
176 (a) The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all Financing
177 Documents and all Closing Documents to which the District is a party that may be necessary or
178 appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds.
179 (b) The Mayor is authorized to execute, in the name of the District and on its behalf, the
180 Financing Documents and any Closing Documents to which the District is a party by the Mayor’s
181 manual or facsimile signature.
8

182 (c) If required, the official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed,
183 printed, or otherwise reproduced on the bonds, the other Financing Documents, and the Closing
184 Documents to which the District is a party.
185 (d) The Mayor’s execution and delivery of the Financing Documents and the Closing
186 Documents to which the District is a party shall constitute conclusive evidence of the Mayor’s
187 approval, on behalf of the District, of the final form and content of the executed Financing
188 Documents and the executed Closing Documents.
189 (e) The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed Financing Documents and
190 Closing Documents, on behalf of the District, prior to or simultaneously with the issuance, sale,
191 and delivery of the bonds, and to ensure the due performance of the obligations of the District
192 contained in the executed, sealed, and delivered Financing Documents and Closing Documents.
193 Sec. 8. Limited liability.
194 (a) The bonds shall be special obligations of the District. The bonds shall be without
195 recourse to the District. The bonds shall not be general obligations of the District, shall not be a
196 pledge of, or involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the taxes
197 or fees deposited into the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund), shall not constitute a debt
198 of the District, and shall not constitute lending of the public credit for private undertakings as
199 prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
200 (b) The bonds shall not give rise to any pecuniary liability of the District and the District
201 shall have no obligation with respect to the purchase of the bonds.
202 (c) No person, including, but not limited to, any bond owner, shall have any claims against
203 the District or any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary
204 damages suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or
9

205 obligation under this act, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents, or as a
206 result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing Documents or
207 the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials, officers,
208 employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.
209 Sec. 9. District officials.
210 (a) Except as otherwise provided in section 8(c), the elected or appointed officials, officers,
211 employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the bonds or
212 be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the bonds, or for any
213 representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this
214 act, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.
215 (b) The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of
216 any official appearing on the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be
217 valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory ceases
218 to hold that office before delivery of the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing
219 Documents.
220 Sec. 10. Maintenance of documents.
221 Copies of the specimen bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing
222 Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State of the District of Columbia.
223 Sec. 11. Information reporting.
224 Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the
225 issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the
226 Council.
227 Sec. 12. Expiration of issuance authority.
10

228 The authority to issue the bonds shall expire on September 30, 2031.
229 Sec. 13. Fiscal impact statement.
230 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
231 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
232 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
233 Sec. 14. Effective date.
234 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
235 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
236 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the Home Rule Act and publication in the District of Columbia
237 Register.
11

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 28, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Certification of the “Nationals Park Financing Act of 2026”
(AE-26-451)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 17, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Nationals Park Financing Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September
10, 2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The bill authorizes the Mayor to issue up to
$410 million of bonds to support upgrades at Nationals Park. The District will begin debt service
payments in fiscal year 2028 and the expected debt service payments are captured in the District’s
debt capacity in the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan.
Background
The Washington Nationals major league baseball team plays in Nationals Park, which was built by
the District and is owned by Events DC. The Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund1 (Fund)
was established to provide funding to the Washington Convention and Sports Authority (Events DC)
to pay for the District’s obligations under the ballpark lease for the maintenance, repairs, and capital
improvements of the ballpark.
The bill authorizes the Mayor to issue one or more series of bonds that aggregate to no more than
$410 million to support upgrades at Nationals Park. The Mayor should not issue any more than is
needed to generate $380 million in net proceeds2 for the development costs of the project. The Mayor
1 Ballpark Budget and Maintenance Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-276; D.C.
Official Code § 10-1601.02a).
2 The net proceeds are the total principal amount minus any issuance, administrative, and financing costs.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Nationals Park Financing Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
September 10, 2026
can issue bonds that would generate less than $380 million in net proceeds if the resources in the
Fund are insufficient to support bonds at that level. The bill ensures that any bonds issued to support
Nationals Park upgrades are not a pledge of, and do not involve, the faith and credit or the taxing
power of the District beyond the Fund’s resources. The Washington Nationals’ project will enhance
the premium fan experience, execute core upgrades, improve the overall fan experience and
connectivity, develop facilities for year-round activation, and perform other modernization projects.
The bill sunsets the Mayor’s authority to issue the bonds on September 30, 2031.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The District’s debt capacity in the fiscal year
2027 through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan accounts for the borrowing necessary to
support the upgrades at Nationals Park. The Chief Financial Officer does not expect to issue the bonds
until late fiscal year 2027, with the first debt payments due in fiscal year 2028.
Page 2 of 2